Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1635.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ADDITION TO STATE PARK.new text end new text begin [85.012] [Subd. 11] Carley State Park, Wabasha County. The following area is added to Carley State Park: That part of Section 32, Township 108 North, Range 11 West, Wabasha County, Minnesota, described as follows: Beginning at the South Quarter corner stake of said Section 32; thence North 15-1/2 degrees East along road 425 feet; thence North 17 degrees East 290 feet; thence North 53 degrees East 280 feet; thence North 17 degrees East 115 feet; thence North 6-1/2 degrees West 643 feet; thence North 72-1/2 degrees West 720 feet; thence North across river 690 feet; thence South 62 degrees East 263 feet along northerly bank of river; thence North 250 feet to center of said Section 32; thence East 1,320 feet; thence North 440 feet to river; thence North 54-1/2 degrees East 224 feet along center of river; thence North 75 degrees East 192 feet; thence South 49 degrees East 115 feet; thence North 79 degrees East 155 feet; thence North 62 degrees East 232 feet; thence North 86 degrees East 293 feet; thence North 64 degrees East 255 feet; thence South 3,368 feet, more or less to the southeast corner of Section 32; thence West 2,643.13 feet to the place of beginning. new text end new text begin EXCEPTING therefrom that portion lying West of the centerline of Wabasha County Road No. 4 owned by the State of Minnesota and A. M. Christenson. new text end new text begin ALSO EXCEPTING that part of the East Half of Section 32, Township 108 North, Range 11 West, Wabasha County, Minnesota, described as follows: Beginning at the South Quarter corner stake of said Section 32; thence North 15-1/2 degrees East along road 425 feet; thence North 17 degrees East 290 feet; thence North 53 degrees East 280 feet; thence South 80 degrees 02 minutes 23 seconds East 304.46 feet; thence North 6 degrees 12 minutes 49 seconds West 483.31 feet; thence South 89 degrees 54 minutes 25 seconds East 386.31 feet; thence North 1 degree 39 minutes 32 seconds East 358.66 feet; thence North 36 degrees 14 minutes 35 seconds East 693.46 feet; thence North 81 degrees 03 minutes 15 seconds East 349.81 feet; thence North 1 degree 49 minutes 43 seconds West 298.16 feet; thence North 79 degrees 04 minutes 47 seconds East 529.39 feet; thence South 35 degrees 46 minutes 01 seconds East to the east line of the Southeast Quarter of Section 32; thence southerly along the east line of said Southeast Quarter to the southeast corner of said Southeast Quarter of Section 32; thence on a bearing of West along the south line of said Southeast Quarter 2,643.13 feet to the point of beginning. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end